Massachusetts, session 194th, S1450.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the 
contrary, the city of Quincy, when authorized by a two thirds vote as defined in section one of 
chapter forty-four, may borrow money by the issue of revenue bonds or notes to pay costs of 
designing, engineering, constructing and reconstructing telecommunications facilities, which 
revenue bonds shall be limited obligations of the city, payable from rates and charges collected 
by the city for the provision of telecommunications services. Such project costs may include all 
costs, whether incurred prior to or after the issue of bonds or notes hereunder, of establishing, 
purchasing, extending or enlarging a municipally owned telecommunications system, 
remodeling, reconstructing, or making extraordinary repairs to a municipally owned 
telecommunications system and for the payment of , financing charges, interest prior to and 
during the carrying out of any project and for a reasonable period thereafter, planning, 

of 7 12 engineering, finance advisory and legal services, administrative expenses, the funding of notes 
issued for project costs as hereinafter provided, such reserves for debt service or other capital or 
current expenses as may be required by a trust agreement or resolution securing any such notes 
or bonds, and all other expenses incidental to the determination of the feasibility of any project 
or to carrying out the project or to placing the project in operation.  Any bonds or notes issued 
pursuant to this act shall not be subject to the limitation on indebtedness set forth in section 10 of 
chapter 44 of the General Laws. 
SECTION 2. The bonds of each issue shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding 
thirty years from their dates of issue, and may be made redeemable before maturity with or 
without premiums.  Subject to the provisions of this act, the treasurer shall determine the date or 
dates of the bonds, their denomination or denominations, the place or places of payment of the 
principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the 
commonwealth, their interest rate or rates, including rates variable from time to time as 
determined by such index, banker's loan rate or other method, maturity or maturities, redemption 
privileges, if any, and the form and other details of the bonds. The bonds shall be signed by the 
city treasurer, and shall bear the seal of the city or a facsimile thereof.  The city may sell its 
bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, for such price, at such rate or rates of 
interest, or at such discount in lieu of interest, as the officers authorized to issue the same shall 
determine.   
SECTION 3. Any bonds issued under this act may be secured by a resolution or by a trust 
or security agreement between the city and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company 
or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the commonwealth, or by a trust 
or security agreement directly between the city and the purchasers of the bonds, and such 

of 7 35 resolution or trust or security agreement shall be in such form and executed in such manner as 
may be determined by the authorized officers. Such trust or security agreement or resolution may 
pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues held or to be received by the city from or on 
account of the operation of its telecommunications facilities, and any contract or other rights to 
receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether then 
held or thereafter acquired by the city, and the proceeds thereof. Such trust or security agreement 
or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security and 
remedies of the bondholders as may, in the discretion of the authorized officers, be reasonable 
and proper and not in violation of law. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such 
agreement or resolution may include provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in 
the event of default, which may include the acceleration of maturities, and covenants setting 
forth the duties of, and limitations on, the city in relation to the custody, safeguarding, 
investment and application of moneys, the issue of additional or refunding bonds, the fixing, 
revision and collection of fees, charges and other revenues, the use of any surplus bond proceeds, 
the establishment of reserves, the construction and operation of the telecommunication facilities, 
and the making and amending of contracts relating to the bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank 
or trust company to act as a depository or trustee of the proceeds of bonds, revenues or other 
moneys under a trust or security agreement or resolution and to furnish such indemnification or 
to pledge such securities and issue such letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities as may 
be required by the city acting hereunder. Any such trust or security agreement or resolution may 
set forth the rights and remedies of bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual 
right of action by bondholders. 

of 7 57  SECTION 4. Any pledge of revenues, contract or other rights to receive revenues, or the 
proceeds thereof made by the city under this act shall be valid and binding and shall be deemed 
continuously perfected for the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code and other laws from 
the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, moneys, rights and proceeds so pledged and 
then held or thereafter acquired or received by the city shall immediately be subject to the lien of 
such pledge without any physical delivery or segregation thereof or further act; and the lien of 
such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, 
contract or otherwise against the city, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. 
Neither the resolution, any trust or security agreement nor any other agreement by which a 
pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the city and no filing need be 
made under the Uniform Commercial Code. 
SECTION 5. The city may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its 
bonds issued pursuant to this act at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. 
Refunding bonds may be issued in such amounts, at such times prior to the maturity or 
redemption of the refunding bonds as the treasurer, with the approval of the mayor, shall 
determine. The refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide the 
principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium on the bonds, any 
interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of such bonds, the expenses of issue of the 
refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt 
service or other expenses from the proceeds of such refunding bonds as may be required by a 
trust or security agreement or resolution securing the bonds.  
SECTION 6. In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, bonds or 
notes issued by the city pursuant to this act may be secured, in whole or in part, by insurance or 

of 7 80 by letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities issued by any bank, trust company or other 
financial institution, within or without the commonwealth, and the city may pledge or assign any 
of the rates and charges collected by the city for the provision of telecommunications services as 
security for the reimbursement by the city to the issuers of such letters or lines of credit, 
insurance or credit facilities of any payments made thereunder. 
SECTION 7. Any debt service fund, construction fund, debt service reserve fund, 
depreciation reserve fund or other fund established in connection with the issuance of bonds 
under this act shall be kept separate from other moneys of the city. The moneys deposited in any 
such funds, together with income derived from any investments held as part of such funds, shall 
be expended without further authorization or appropriation as provided for in the trust or security 
agreement or resolution establishing such funds. 
SECTION 8. All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this act, whether as 
proceeds from the issue of bonds, as revenues, or otherwise, shall be deemed to be trust funds to 
be held and applied solely as provided in this act. 
SECTION 9. The provisions of this act shall be deemed to provide an additional and 
alternative method for the effectuation of the purposes of this act and shall be construed to be 
supplemental to, and not in derogation of, powers otherwise conferred by law on the city, 
provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of this act are inconsistent with the provisions 
of any general or special law, administrative order or rule, the provisions of this act shall be 
controlling. 
100  SECTION 10. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall 
101 appear on any bonds or notes issued under this act shall cease to be such officer before the 

of 7 102 delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all 
103 purposes the same as if he or she had remained in office until after such delivery.  
104  SECTION 11. The owner of real property located in the city may enter into an agreement 
105 with the city to pay a fixed assessment for a right of access of that real property to one or more 
106 service connections to the city’s telecommunications facilities.   A notice of such agreement, or 
107 of multiple agreements,  shall be recorded as a betterment and except as otherwise set forth 
108 herein, or by the agreement of the parties hereunder, shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 
109 eighty relative to the apportionment, division, reassessment and collection of assessment, 
110 abatement and collections of assessments, and to interest; provided, however, that for purposes 
111 of this section, such lien shall take effect by operation of law on the day immediately following 
112 the due date of such assessment or apportioned part of such assessment and such assessment may 
113 bear interest at a rate determined by the city treasurer, or by agreement with the owner at the 
114 time such agreement is entered into between the city and the property owner. In addition to 
115 remedies available under chapter eighty, the property owner shall be personally liable for 
116 payment under the agreement; provided, however, that upon assumption of such personal 
117 obligation to a purchaser or other transferee of all of the original owners interest in the property 
118 at the time of conveyance and the recording of such assumption, the owner shall be relieved of 
119 such personal liability.  An agreement between an owner and the city pursuant to this act shall 
120 not be considered a breach of limitation or prohibition contained in a note, mortgage or contract 
121 on the transfer of an interest in property. 
122  Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 183A to the contrary, the organization of unit 
123 owners of a condominium may petition the city to enter into an agreement pursuant to this act. 
124 Such agreement shall: (i) be approved by a majority of the unit owners; (ii) include an 

of 7 125 identification of the units and unit owners subject to the agreement; and (iii) include a statement 
126 by an officer or trustee of the organization of unit owners certifying that the required number of 
127 unit owners have approved the agreement. As between the affected unit owners and the city, 
128 such certification shall be conclusive evidence of the authority of the organization of unit owners 
129 to enter into the agreement. A notice of such agreement shall be recorded as a betterment in the 
130 registry of deeds or registry district of the land court where the master deed is recorded and shall 
131 be otherwise subject to the provisions of chapter 80 as provided for in this act. The assessment 
132 under such agreement may be charged or assessed to the organization of unit owners but shall 
133 not constitute an assessment of common expenses. Instead, the allocable share of the assessment 
134 shall attach as a lien to the units identified in the recorded notice and the owners of such units 
135 shall also be personally liable for their allocable share of the assessment as provided for in this 
136 section.  
137  The assessment charged pursuant to all agreements authorized by this act shall be a 
138 uniform charge for each service connection allowed under such agreement, the city may 
139 determine from time to time, to increase the charge, based upon generally accepted consumer 
140 price indexes.  The assessment charged pursuant to an agreement shall remain unchanged for the 
141 term of that agreement.  Revenues received by the city from charges assessed under this act shall 
142 be used first to pay amounts due under long-term obligations of the city related to the  city’s 
143 telecommunications facilities, and any remaining receipts shall be used to offset operational 
144 costs of the city’s telecommunications facilities. 
145  SECTION 12. This act shall take effect upon its passage.